Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 13. Records of Certain Missing or Transferred Children.

Sec. 14.30.700.
Records of missing children.

Upon notification by the Department of Public Safety of a child’s disappearance, a school or school district in which the child is currently or was previously enrolled shall flag the school record of that child in a manner that, when a copy or information regarding the record is requested, the school or school district shall be alerted to the fact that the record is that of a missing child. The school or school district shall immediately report to the Department of Public Safety a request regarding flagged records, including any knowledge as to the whereabouts of the child. Upon notification by the Department of Public Safety that the person who was listed as a missing child has been found, the school or school district shall remove the flag from the person’s record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1990)

Sec. 14.30.710.
Required records upon transfer.

Within 14 days after enrolling a child as a transfer student from this or another state in an elementary or secondary school, the school or school district shall request directly from the child’s previous school a certified copy of the child’s record. An elementary or secondary school or a school district in this state requested to forward a copy of a transferring child’s record to another school shall comply with the request within 10 days after receiving the request unless the record has been flagged under AS

14.30.700

. Upon receipt of a request for a record that has been flagged, the school or school district shall immediately notify the Department of Public Safety. Unless directed to do so by the Department of Public Safety, a school or a school district may not forward a copy of a flagged record. In this section, “record” includes information about the child’s commission of an offense that is punishable as a felony or that involved the use of a deadly weapon, as that term is defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1999)

Sec. 14.30.720.
Definitions.

In AS

14.30.700

—

14.30.720

,

“child” means a person under 18 years of age;

“school district” means a municipal school district or a regional educational attendance area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1990)